Wyoming statutes. Title 38 Sureties
Chapter 1 Rights and Remedies of Sureties

Cross references. —

As to justification by sureties, see §

1-1-104

.

As to qualifications of sureties, see §

1-1-105

.

As to bonds in attachment and garnishment proceedings, see §§

1-15-104

,

1-15-105

,

1-15-405

.

As to bonds in replevin actions, see §§

1-15-301

to

1-15-306

.

As to stay, supersedeas and appeal bonds, see §§

1-17-201

to

1-17-202

,

1-17-705

; Rules 62(c), (d), Rules 4.01 and 4.02, W.R.A.P.

As to bonds in proceedings for injunctions, see §

1-28-108

; Rule 65(c), W.R.C.P.

As to sureties for executors and administrators, see §§

2-3-102

,

2-3-106

,

2-3-109

,

2-3-113

to

2-3-120

,

2-11-301

.

As to sureties for trustees for missing persons, see §

2-12-105

.

As to sureties for guardians, see §

3-2-108

.

As to bail in criminal proceedings, see §§

7-10-101

to

7-10-106

, Rule 8, 3.1, W.R.Cr.P.

As to sureties on bonds of state officers, see §

9-2-1016

.

As to definition of “surety insurance,” see §

26-5-105

.

As to surety insurance rates and rate filings, see §§

26-14-105

,

26-14-107

to

26-14-109

,

26-14-112

.

As to surety contracts subject to Insurance Code, see §

26-21-101

.

As to proceedings against sureties, see Rule 65.1, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

38-1-101

to

38-1-109

were enacted as ch. 6, division VII, of the civil code, Laws 1886, ch. 60.

Application. —

Statute cannot apply where oil land lessee’s bond was executed in favor of government lessor and surety suffered additional liability through neglect or laches of government official upon whom demand to bring suit for cancellation of lease was made, since government is not responsible for laches or wrongful acts of its officers. United States v. Schendel, 52 F. Supp. 772, 1943 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1983 (D. Wyo. 1943).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

74 Am. Jur. 2d Suretyship § 1 et seq.

Conclusiveness and effect, upon surety, of default or consent judgment against principal, 59 ALR2d 752.

Reformation of instrument as against surety, 79 ALR2d 1180.

Surety as a creditor within contemplation of bulk sales law, 85 ALR2d 1211.

Person who signs contract of suretyship but is not named in the body thereof as party to contract and liable thereunder, 94 ALR2d 691.

Right of guarantor or surety to compel coguarantors or cosureties to pay their share to creditor, 38 ALR3d 680.

Liability of surety on infant’s contract or obligation where contract is disaffirmed by infant, 44 ALR3d 1417.

Change in name, location, composition or structure of obligor commercial enterprise subsequent to execution of guaranty or surety agreement as affecting liability of guarantor or surety to the obligee, 69 ALR3d 567.

Creditor’s duty of disclosure to surety or guarantor after inception of suretyship or guaranty, 63 ALR4th 678.

Computation of net “loss” for which fidelity insurer is liable, 5 ALR5th 132.

Liability of surety on private bond for statutory penalties imposed for nonpayment, 19 ALR5th 900.

72 C.J.S. Principal and Surety § 1 et seq.

§ 38-1-101.
Requiring suit by creditor.

A person bound as surety in a written instrument for the payment of money, or other valuable thing, may, if right of action accrues thereon, require his creditor by a notice in writing, to commence an action on such instrument forthwith, against the principal debtor; and unless the creditor commences such action within a reasonable time thereafter, and proceed with due diligence, in the ordinary course of law, to recover judgment against the principal debtor for the money or other valuable thing due thereby, and to make by execution the amount thereof, the creditor, or the assignee of such instrument so failing to comply with the requisition of such surety shall thereby forfeit the right which he would otherwise have to demand, and receive of such surety, the amount due thereon.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 690; R.S. 1887, § 3038; R.S. 1899, § 4163; C.S. 1910, § 5023; C.S. 1920, § 6293; R.S. 1931, § 89-4101; C.S. 1945, § 3-7701; W.S. 1957, § 38-1.

Due process. —

Although this section shows that Wyoming has a policy interest in ensuring a forum for creditors, this interest does not involve the requisite state action to invoke the federal or Wyoming due process clause. Pete Lien & Sons v. Ellsworth Peck Constr. Co., 896 P.2d 761,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1995).

Reasonable notice. —

A bond notice provision which requires the claimant to notify the principal, owner or surety of a claim within 90-days of finishing work is reasonable. Pete Lien & Sons v. Ellsworth Peck Constr. Co., 896 P.2d 761,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Lange v. Valencia, 533 P.2d 304,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

Halliburton Co. v. Claypoole, 868 P.2d 252,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes action on bond, executed under law of United States, so as to be within federal district court’s jurisdiction under 28 USC § 1352, 105 ALR Fed 716.

§ 38-1-102.
Requiring suit by creditor; requisition by personal representative of surety.

The executor or administrator of a surety so bound may, in like manner, make such requisition of the creditor, or his executor or administrator, as provided in the preceding section [§

38-1-101

]; and in case of failure of the creditor, or his executor or administrator, to proceed as therein required, the executor or administrator, if he make the requisition, shall have the same relief as is therein provided for a surety.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 691; R.S. 1887, § 3039; R.S. 1899, § 4164; C.S. 1910, § 5024; C.S. 1920, § 6294; R.S. 1931, § 89-4102; C.S. 1945, § 3-7702; W.S. 1957, § 38-2.

§ 38-1-103.
Requiring suit by creditor; what bonds not affected.

Nothing in the last two (2) sections [§§

38-1-101

,

38-1-102

] contained shall be so construed as to affect bonds required by law to be given by guardians, executors, administrators, trustees of an express trust, public officers, or any bond or undertaking required by law to be given in an action or legal proceeding in any court in this state.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 692; R.S. 1887, § 3040; R.S. 1899, § 4165; C.S. 1910, § 5025; C.S. 1920, § 6295; R.S. 1931, § 89-4103; C.S. 1945, § 3-7703; W.S. 1957, § 38-3.

Applied

in

Lange v. Valencia, 533 P.2d 304,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 38-1-104.
Rights on paying judgment.

When the surety on a judgment, who is certified therein to be such, or his personal representative pays the judgment, or any part thereof, he shall, to the extent of such payment, have all the rights and remedies against the principal debtor that the plaintiff had at the time of such payment; and proceedings to revive the judgment shall be as provided in section three hundred and seventy-four [§

1-16-502

], and shall be in the name of such surety or representative; but the plaintiff in the original action shall not be liable for any costs therein.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 693; R.S. 1887, § 3041; R.S. 1899, § 4166; C.S. 1910, § 5026; C.S. 1920, § 6296; R.S. 1931, § 89-4104; C.S. 1945, § 3-7704; W.S. 1957, § 38-4.

§ 38-1-105.
Application for release by surety of school district treasurer.

A surety of the treasurer of school funds in any school district, organized under the provisions of law, may at any time notify the board of county commissioners of the proper county, by giving at least five (5) days notice in writing, that he is unwilling to continue as surety for such treasurer, and will, at a time therein named, make application to the board of county commissioners to be released from further liability upon his bond; and he shall also give at least three (3) days notice in writing to such treasurer, of the time and place at which the application will be made.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 698; R.S. 1887, § 3046; R.S. 1899, § 4167; C.S. 1910, § 5027; C.S. 1920, § 6297; R.S. 1931, § 89-4105; C.S. 1945, § 3-7705; W.S. 1957, § 38-5.

Cross references. —

As to release of sureties of bonds of state, county or municipal officers, see §

38-2-106

.

§ 38-1-106.
Application for release by surety of school district treasurer; action of commissioners.

The board of county commissioners, upon such notice being given, shall hear the application, and if in their opinion there is good reason therefor, shall require the treasurer to give a new bond, conditioned according to law and to the satisfaction of the board, within such time as they may direct, and if the treasurer fail to execute such bond, the office shall be deemed vacant and shall be immediately filled as other vacancies therein; but such sureties shall not be released or discharged until the filing of the new bond or the expiration of the time allowed therefor; and the cost of such application shall be paid by the person making the same.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 699; R.S. 1887, § 3047; R.S. 1899, § 4168; C.S. 1910, § 5028; C.S. 1920, § 6298; R.S. 1931, § 89-4106; C.S. 1945, § 3-7706; W.S. 1957, § 38-6.

§ 38-1-107.
Compelling principal to pay debt.

A surety may maintain an action against his principal to compel him to discharge the debt or liability, for which the surety is bound, after the same becomes due.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 702; R.S. 1887, § 3050; R.S. 1899, § 4169; C.S. 1910, § 5029; C.S. 1920, § 6299; R.S. 1931, § 89-4107; C.S. 1945, § 3-7707; W.S. 1957, § 38-7.

Apportionment of proceeds. —

Where notes were made payable to 1 of several sureties only, equity would apportion the proceeds of the notes to each. Bolln v. Metcalf, 6 Wyo. 1, 42 P. 12,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1895).

Liability of partner. —

Where sureties on bond attempted to levy an attachment on defaulting principal’s supposed interest in a partnership, and a member of the firm, to avoid the attachment, executed notes equal to the amount embezzled, maker is liable on the notes on payment by the sureties of a judgment against them for said amount. Bolln v. Metcalf, 6 Wyo. 1, 42 P. 12,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1895).

Applied

in

Lange v. Valencia, 533 P.2d 304,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 38-1-108.
Action for indemnity before debt due.

A surety may maintain an action against his principal to obtain indemnity against the debt or liability for which he is bound before it is due whenever any of the grounds exist upon which, by the provisions of this act, an order may be made for arrest, or for an attachment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 703; R.S. 1887, § 3051; R.S. 1899, § 4170; C.S. 1910, § 5030; C.S. 1920, § 6300; R.S. 1931, § 89-4108; C.S. 1945, § 3-7708; W.S. 1957, § 38-8.

Editor's notes. —

The words “this act” refer to the civil code, Laws 1886, ch. 60.

Surrender of deposit. —

Where surety on a bond who had been indemnified by a deposit of money by the principal surrendered the deposit on dismissal of the action, such surrender did not affect his liability on the bond on reversal of the judgment of dismissal, the surrender having been without the consent of the obligee. Snow v. Duxstad, 23 Wyo. 82, 147 P. 174,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1915).

Cited

in

Bolln v. Metcalf, 6 Wyo. 1, 42 P. 12,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1895).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Attachment against principal by surety before debt is due, 58 ALR2d 1451.

§ 38-1-109.
Action for indemnity before debt due; obtaining provisional remedies.

In such action the surety may obtain any of the provisional remedies mentioned in division six of this act, upon the grounds and in the manner therein provided.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 704; R.S. 1887, § 3052; R.S. 1899, § 4171; C.S. 1910, § 5031; C.S. 1920, § 6301; R.S. 1931, § 89-4109; C.S. 1945, § 3-7709; W.S. 1957, § 38-9.

Editor's notes. —

The words “division six of this act” refer to division VI of the civil code, Laws 1886, ch. 60.

Promissory notes as security. —

Promissory notes given to a surety upon bond of a defaulting officer by a third person, to indemnify such surety, will be held as security for benefit of a cosurety equally with payee named in the notes. Bolln v. Metcalf, 6 Wyo. 1, 42 P. 12,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1895).